Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5118
Legal tender.

All cash payments of principal, interest, premiums, dividends, and other cash consideration received on any investment authorized under the Insurers Investment Act shall be payable in lawful money of the United States except as provided in section 44-5137.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 9.